Maine, session 132, LD1034.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1107-A, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 383, §127
and affected by §156, is amended to read:
D. A schedule X drug. Violation of this paragraph is a Class D crime, except that it is
not a violation of this paragraph if the drug possessed is psilocybin, the amount
possessed is one ounce or less and the person is 21 years of age or older;